Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is  appropriated to the Land Use Board of Appeals, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,481,376.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $39,616
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Land Use Board of Ap-
peals.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5529 (SB 5529-A) Page 2